Rhode Island statutes. Title 16 Education
Chapter 2.1 Civic Education Commission

16-2.1-1.
Civic education commission.

There is hereby created a permanent commission to be known as the Rhode Island Permanent Commission on Civic Education to consist of twenty-one (21) members; three (3) of whom shall be from the house of representatives, not more than two (2) from the same political party, to be appointed by the speaker; three (3) of whom shall be from the senate, not more than two (2) from the same political party, to be appointed by the senate president; one of whom shall be the Rhode Island secretary of state, or designee; two (2) of whom shall be teachers or representatives of teachers, one of whom shall be a member of the National Education Association of Rhode Island, to be appointed by the speaker, and one of whom shall be a member of the American Federation of Teachers, to be appointed by the senate president; one of whom shall be a member of the Superintendent’s Association, or Principal’s Association, to be appointed by the speaker; one of whom shall be the director of the Rhode Island Historical Society, or designee; one of whom shall be the commissioner of elementary and secondary education, or designee; one of whom shall be the commissioner of postsecondary education, or designee; one of whom shall be from the Rhode Island Black Heritage Society, to be appointed by the speaker; one of whom shall be from the Dorcas International Institute of Rhode Island, to be appointed by the senate president; one of whom shall be a teacher at a parochial/private school institution, to be appointed by the speaker; one of whom shall be the director of museum and program at the Rhode Island Heritage Harbor Foundation, or designee; one of whom shall be the director of the Rhode Island Council for the Humanities, or designee; one of whom shall be the director of the Pell Center for International Relations and Public Policy, or designee; one of whom shall be the director of the Progreso Latino, or designee; and one of whom shall be the director of the Center for Civic Education, or designee.

History of Section.

P.L. 2001, ch. 388, § 1; P.L. 2004, ch. 477, § 1; P.L. 2004, ch. 543, § 1; P.L. 2017, ch. 209, § 1; P.L. 2017, ch. 245, § 1.

16-2.1-2.
Powers and duties.

The commission is empowered to appoint committees to study specialized areas of concern and to report their findings and recommendations to the commission; provided, however, that one of these committees shall be a Rhode Island history committee.

All departments and agencies of the state shall furnish advice and information, documentary and otherwise, to the commission and its agents as may be necessary or desirable to facilitate the purposes of this chapter.

The commission shall report its findings and/or recommendations to the speaker of the house of representatives, the senate president, and the commissioner of elementary and secondary education.

Eight (8) members of the commission shall constitute a quorum.

The commission shall meet at least two (2) times per year.

History of Section.

P.L. 2001, ch. 388, § 1; P.L. 2017, ch. 209, § 1; P.L. 2017, ch. 245, § 1.

16-2.1-3.
Definitions.

As used in this chapter, “civic education” means the goal of education in civic and government is informed, responsible participation in political life by competent citizens committed to the fundamental values and principles on American constitutional democracy. Their effective and responsible participation requires the acquisition of a body of knowledge and of intellectual and participatory skills. Effective and responsible participation also is furthered by development of certain dispositions or traits of character that enhance the individual’s capacity to participate in the political process and contribute to the healthy functioning of the political system and improvement of society.

History of Section.

P.L. 2001, ch. 388, § 1.